Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE B. LAW ENFORCEMENT AND PUBLIC PROTECTION

CHAPTER 425. PEACE OFFICER WELLNESS PROGRAM

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 425.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commission" means the Health and Human Services Commission.

(2) "Fund" means the peace officer wellness fund.

(3) "Law enforcement agency" means a state agency or political subdivision of this state that employs at least 20 peace officers described by Article 2.12(1), (3), (4), (8), or (10), Code of Criminal Procedure, to answer emergency calls for service or conduct patrol operations, traffic enforcement, or criminal investigations.

(4) "Violent incident" means an incident involving a peace officer that occurs while the officer is performing official duties and that poses a substantial risk of serious harm to the officer's mental health or well-being, including responding to a homicide, suicide, or fatal motor vehicle accident.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 615 (H.B. 3858), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER B. WELLNESS PROGRAM

Sec. 425.051. ESTABLISHMENT OF PROGRAM. A law enforcement agency may establish and maintain a wellness program for the agency's peace officers.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 615 (H.B. 3858), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 425.052. PROGRAM REQUIREMENTS. A law enforcement agency that establishes a wellness program must ensure the program complies with any requirements established by the commission and is available to each peace officer who has routinely responded to and may have been affected by a violent incident. The program at a minimum must provide:

(1) an initial telephone call or other form of contact from an agency representative to monitor the mental and physical well-being of a peace officer who may have been affected by a violent incident; and

(2) information regarding mental health resources, including counseling and therapy services, to a peace officer who is struggling to cope with the effect on the officer of responding to a violent incident.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 615 (H.B. 3858), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER C. PEACE OFFICER WELLNESS FUND AND GRANT PROGRAM

Sec. 425.101. FUND. (a) The peace officer wellness fund is an account in the general revenue fund.

(b) The fund is composed of:

(1) money appropriated to the fund by the legislature;

(2) gifts and grants contributed to the fund; and

(3) the earnings of the fund.

(c) Money in the fund may be appropriated only to the commission. The commission may use the money only for making grants under Section 425.102.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 615 (H.B. 3858), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 425.102. PEACE OFFICER WELLNESS GRANT PROGRAM. (a) The commission shall establish and administer a grant program to assist law enforcement agencies in establishing and maintaining peace officer wellness programs as required under Subchapter B.

(b) The commission shall establish:

(1) eligibility criteria for grant applicants;

(2) grant application procedures;

(3) guidelines relating to grant amounts;

(4) procedures for evaluating grant applications;

(5) guidelines relating to the use of a grant awarded under the program, including the reimbursement of costs associated with the provision of counseling and therapy services to peace officers participating in a wellness program; and

(6) procedures for monitoring the use of a grant awarded under the program and ensuring compliance with any condition of a grant.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 615 (H.B. 3858), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.